Louisiana, session 2026, HB723.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:232(3)(a), (b), (e), (f), and (g) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 32:232(3)(h) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§232. Traffic-control signals
Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different
colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in
combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except for special
pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and said lights shall indicate and apply to
drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:
* * *
(3) Steady RED indication:
(a) Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red signal alone shall stop at a
clearly marked stop line, or if none, then before entering the crosswalk on the near
side of the intersection, or if none, then before entering the intersection, and shall
remain standing until an indication to proceed is shown except as provided in
Subparagraph (c) and (e) of this Paragraph.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 723 ENROLLED
(b) Vehicular traffic facing a steady red arrow signal shall not enter the
intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow and, unless entering the
intersection to make a movement permitted by another signal, shall stop at a clearly
marked stop line, or if none, then before entering the crosswalk on the near side of
the intersection, or if none, then before entering the intersection, and shall remain
standing until an indication permitting the movement indicated by such red arrow is
shown except as provided in Subparagraph (c) and (e) of this Paragraph.
* * *
(e)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, including
this Paragraph, if the driver of a two or three-wheeled motorcycle, moped, or bicycle
or any electric bicycle approaches an intersection influenced by a vehicle-actuated
control, the driver may proceed through the intersection on a steady red light only
if the driver does all of the following:
(aa) Comes to, and maintains, a full and complete stop at the intersection for
two complete cycles of the traffic-control signal or for two minutes, whichever
occurs first.
(bb) Treats the traffic control device as a stop sign.
(cc) Determines it is safe to proceed.
(dd) Yields the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent
crosswalk.
(ee) Yields the right-of-way to the driver of any vehicle approaching an
intersection from either direction.
(ii) For purposes of this Subparagraph, the following definitions shall apply:
(aa) "Cycle" means the total time to complete one sequence of signalization
for all movements at an intersection. In a vehicle-actuated controller system, the
cycle is a complete sequence of all signal indications.
(bb) "Vehicle-actuated control" means a system that manages the signal
through automatically moving vehicles. The actuated signal timing is influenced by
traffic demand, and it is detected through sensors at all the approaches. Two
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 723 ENROLLED
complete cycles of a traffic-control signal constitutes being vehicle-actuated
influenced.
(e) (f) Notwithstanding any provision contained in this Section to the
contrary, for red indications or signal infractions, if the violation results in the injury
of another person, the offender shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars nor
more than five hundred dollars and may be subjected to a driver's license suspension
for a period of ninety days, or both.
(f) (g) If the violation results in the serious bodily injury of another person,
the offender shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one
thousand dollars, imprisoned for not more than six months, or both. The offender
may also be subjected to a driver's license suspension for a period of one hundred
eighty days.
(g) (h) If the violation results in the death of another person, the offender
shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars,
imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. The offender may also be subjected
to a driver's license suspension for a period of up to three hundred sixty-five days.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.